North Carolina statutes. Chapter 148. State Prison System.
Article 2. Prison Regulations.
§ 148-19.1.
Exemption from licensure and certificate of need. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

Inpatient chemical dependency or substance abuse facilities that provide services exclusively to inmates of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety shall be exempt from licensure by the Department of Health and Human Services under Chapter 122C of the General Statutes. If an inpatient chemical dependency or substance abuse facility provides services both to inmates of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety and to members of the general public, the portion of the facility that serves inmates shall be exempt from licensure.

Any person who contracts to provide inpatient chemical dependency or substance abuse services to inmates of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety may construct and operate a new chemical dependency or substance abuse facility for that purpose without first obtaining a certificate of need from the Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to Article 9 of Chapter 131E of the General Statutes. However, a new facility or addition developed for that purpose without a certificate of need shall not be licensed pursuant to Chapter 122C of the General Statutes and shall not admit anyone other than inmates unless the owner or operator first obtains a certificate of need.

History.

2001-424, s. 25.19(a); 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2017-186, s. 2(jjjjjjj).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective until January 1, 2023. For the section as amended January 1, 2023, see the following section, also numbered

G.S. 148-19.1

.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(eeee), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(jjjjjjj), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” throughout the section.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(eeee), in subsection (a), substituted “the Department of Adult Correction or offenders under the supervision of the Division of Community Supervision and Reentry of the Department of Adult Correction” for “the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” in the first sentence and, in the last sentence, inserted “or offenders under supervision” twice and deleted “of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” following “both to inmates”; and substituted “Department of Adult Correction or to offenders under the supervision of the Division of Community Supervision and Reentry of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” in the first sentence of subsection (b).

§ 148-19.1.
Exemption from licensure and certificate of need. [Effective January 1, 2023]

Inpatient chemical dependency or substance abuse facilities that provide services exclusively to inmates of the Department of Adult Correction or offenders under the supervision of the Division of Community Supervision and Reentry of the Department of Adult Correction shall be exempt from licensure by the Department of Health and Human Services under Chapter 122C of the General Statutes. If an inpatient chemical dependency or substance abuse facility provides services both to inmates or offenders under supervision and to members of the general public, the portion of the facility that serves inmates or offenders under supervision shall be exempt from licensure.

Any person who contracts to provide inpatient chemical dependency or substance abuse services to inmates of the Department of Adult Correction or to offenders under the supervision of the Division of Community Supervision and Reentry of the Department of Adult Correction may construct and operate a new chemical dependency or substance abuse facility for that purpose without first obtaining a certificate of need from the Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to Article 9 of Chapter 131E of the General Statutes. However, a new facility or addition developed for that purpose without a certificate of need shall not be licensed pursuant to Chapter 122C of the General Statutes and shall not admit anyone other than inmates unless the owner or operator first obtains a certificate of need.

History.

2001-424, s. 25.19(a); 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2017-186, s. 2(jjjjjjj); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(eeee).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective until January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered

G.S. 148-19.1

.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(eeee), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(jjjjjjj), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” throughout the section.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(eeee), in subsection (a), substituted “the Department of Adult Correction or offenders under the supervision of the Division of Community Supervision and Reentry of the Department of Adult Correction” for “the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” in the first sentence and, in the last sentence, inserted “or offenders under supervision” twice and deleted “of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” following “both to inmates”; and substituted “Department of Adult Correction or to offenders under the supervision of the Division of Community Supervision and Reentry of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” in the first sentence of subsection (b).

§ 148-19.2.
Mandatory HIV testing. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

Each person sentenced to imprisonment and committed to the custody of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety shall be tested to determine whether the person is HIV positive.

Each inmate who has not previously tested positive for HIV shall also be tested:

Not less than once every four years from the date of that inmate’s initial testing.

Prior to the inmate’s release from the custody of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, except that testing is not mandatory prior to the release of an inmate who has been tested within one year of the inmate’s release date.In each case, the results of the test shall be reported to the inmate. If an inmate tests positive for HIV, that inmate shall be referred to public health officials for counseling.

History.

2013-360, s. 16C.15(a); 2017-186, s. 2(kkkkkkk).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), (q), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(kkkkkkk), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” throughout the section.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), (q), substituted “Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice” in the first paragraph and substituted “Division of Prisons” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice” in paragraph (2). For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 148-19.2.
Mandatory HIV testing. [Effective January 1, 2023]

Each person sentenced to imprisonment and committed to the custody of the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction shall be tested to determine whether the person is HIV positive.

Each inmate who has not previously tested positive for HIV shall also be tested:

Not less than once every four years from the date of that inmate’s initial testing.

Prior to the inmate’s release from the custody of the Division of Prisons, except that testing is not mandatory prior to the release of an inmate who has been tested within one year of the inmate’s release date.In each case, the results of the test shall be reported to the inmate. If an inmate tests positive for HIV, that inmate shall be referred to public health officials for counseling.

History.

2013-360, s. 16C.15(a); 2017-186, s. 2(kkkkkkk); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), (q).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), (q), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(kkkkkkk), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” throughout the section.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), (q), substituted “Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice” in the first paragraph and substituted “Division of Prisons” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice” in paragraph (2). For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 148-19.3.
Health care services to county prisoners.

All charges that are the responsibility of the transferring county for health care services provided to prisoners held under a safekeeping order pursuant to

G.S. 162-39

, or the Statewide Misdemeanant Confinement Program pursuant to

G.S. 148-32.1

, shall not be paid by the Department and shall be submitted by the health care provider to the Inmate Medical Costs Management Plan through the North Carolina Sheriffs’ Association for the Plan to review and negotiate all charges for health care services to avoid overpayment and reduce overall health care service costs. The Department shall notify the health care provider when services are being provided to the prisoner that the invoice for health care services shall be submitted by the provider directly to the Plan. In the event an invoice is sent to the Department by a health care provider for health care services provided to a safekeeper under this section or

G.S. 148-32.1

, the Department shall forward the invoice to the Plan within three days of receipt. All unreimbursed charges for health care services provided shall be documented and presented to the county for payment in accordance with

G.S. 162-39

or the Statewide Misdemeanant Confinement Program in accordance with G.S. 148-32.1. Upon expiration of the terms of the order and a determination that the prisoner may be safely returned to the custody of the county, the Department shall notify the sheriff, or the sheriff’s designee, by telephone and electronic mail and request the transfer of the prisoner to the custody of the county.

The Department shall update the medical services schedule of charges assessed to counties for the provision of health care services to county prisoners housed in the State prison system pursuant to safekeeping orders under

G.S. 162-39

or the Statewide Misdemeanant Confinement Program under

G.S. 148-32.1

. In updating the schedule of charges, at a minimum, the Department shall consider the actual rate for services provided and current established Medicaid rates for respective services. The schedule of charges shall be updated annually and shall be included in the Department’s policies and procedures. The Department shall assess charges to counties for health care services provided to county prisoners at all State prison facilities.

History.

2019-171, s. 2(a); 2020-83, s. 9(a).

§ 148-20.
Corporal punishment of prisoners prohibited. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

It is unlawful for the Secretary of Public Safety or any other person having the care, custody, or control of any prisoner in this State to make or enforce any rule or regulation providing for the whipping, flogging, or administration of any similar corporal punishment of any prisoner, or to give any specific order for or cause to be administered or personally to administer or inflict any such corporal punishment.

History.

1917, c. 286, s. 7; C.S., s. 7728; 1925, c. 163; 1933, c. 172, s. 18; 1955, c. 238, s. 9; 1963, c. 1174, s. 1; 1967, c. 996, s. 15; 1973, c. 1262, s. 10; 2011-145, s. 19.1(i).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendment to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), effective January 1, 2023, substituted “Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Secretary of Public Safety” near the beginning. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 148-20.
Corporal punishment of prisoners prohibited. [Effective January 1, 2023]

It is unlawful for the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction or any other person having the care, custody, or control of any prisoner in this State to make or enforce any rule or regulation providing for the whipping, flogging, or administration of any similar corporal punishment of any prisoner, or to give any specific order for or cause to be administered or personally to administer or inflict any such corporal punishment.

History.

1917, c. 286, s. 7; C.S., s. 7728; 1925, c. 163; 1933, c. 172, s. 18; 1955, c. 238, s. 9; 1963, c. 1174, s. 1; 1967, c. 996, s. 15; 1973, c. 1262, s. 10; 2011-145, s. 19.1(i); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendment to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), effective January 1, 2023, substituted “Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Secretary of Public Safety” near the beginning. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 148-21.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1963, c. 1174, s. 5.

§ 148-22.
Treatment programs. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The general policies, rules, and regulations of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety shall provide for humane treatment of prisoners and for programs to effect their correction and return to the community as promptly as practicable. Visits and correspondence between prisoners and approved friends shall be authorized under reasonable conditions, and family members shall be permitted and encouraged to maintain close contact with the prisoners unless the contacts prove to be hurtful. Casework, counseling, and psychotherapy services provided to prisoners may be extended to include members of the prisoner’s family if practicable and necessary to achieve the purposes of the programs. Education, library, recreation, and vocational training programs shall be developed so as to coordinate with corresponding services and opportunities which will be available to the prisoner when he or she is released. Programs may be established for the treatment and training of prisoners with intellectual or other developmental disabilities and other special groups. These programs may be operated in segregated sections of facilities housing other prisoners or in separate facilities.

The Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety may cooperate with and seek the cooperation of public and private agencies, institutions, officials, and individuals in the development and conduct of programs designed to give persons committed to the Division opportunities for physical, mental, and moral improvement. The Division may enter into agreements with other agencies of federal, State, or local government and with private agencies to promote the most effective use of available resources.Specifically the Secretary of Public Safety may enter into contracts or agreements with appropriate public or private agencies offering needed services including health, mental health, behavioral health, intellectual and other developmental disability, substance abuse, rehabilitative, or training services for such inmates of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety as the Secretary may deem eligible. These agencies shall be reimbursed from applicable appropriations to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety for services rendered at a rate not to exceed that which the agencies normally receive for serving their regular clients.The Secretary may contract for the housing of work-release inmates at county jails and local confinement facilities. Inmates may be placed in the care of the agencies but shall remain the responsibility of the Division and shall be subject to the complete supervision of the Division. The Division may reimburse the agencies for the support of the inmates at a rate not in excess of the average daily cost of inmate care in the corrections unit to which the inmate would otherwise be assigned.

History.

1917, c. 286, s. 15; C.S., s. 7732; 1925, c. 163; 1933, c. 172, s. 18; 1955, c. 238, s. 9; 1967, c. 996, s. 5; 1975, c. 679, ss. 1, 2; 1977, c. 297; 1983, c. 376; 1985, c. 589, s. 55; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i); 2017-186, s. 2(lllllll); 2019-76, s. 29.

§ 148-22.
Treatment programs. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The general policies, rules, and regulations of the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction shall provide for humane treatment of prisoners and for programs to effect their correction and return to the community as promptly as practicable. Visits and correspondence between prisoners and approved friends shall be authorized under reasonable conditions, and family members shall be permitted and encouraged to maintain close contact with the prisoners unless the contacts prove to be hurtful. Casework, counseling, and psychotherapy services provided to prisoners may be extended to include members of the prisoner’s family if practicable and necessary to achieve the purposes of the programs. Education, library, recreation, and vocational training programs shall be developed so as to coordinate with corresponding services and opportunities which will be available to the prisoner when he or she is released. Programs may be established for the treatment and training of prisoners with intellectual or other developmental disabilities and other special groups. These programs may be operated in segregated sections of facilities housing other prisoners or in separate facilities.

The Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction may cooperate with and seek the cooperation of public and private agencies, institutions, officials, and individuals in the development and conduct of programs designed to give persons committed to the Division opportunities for physical, mental, and moral improvement. The Division may enter into agreements with other agencies of federal, State, or local government and with private agencies to promote the most effective use of available resources.Specifically the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction may enter into contracts or agreements with appropriate public or private agencies offering needed services including health, mental health, behavioral health, intellectual and other developmental disability, substance abuse, rehabilitative, or training services for such inmates of the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction as the Secretary may deem eligible. These agencies shall be reimbursed from applicable appropriations to the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction for services rendered at a rate not to exceed that which the agencies normally receive for serving their regular clients.The Secretary may contract for the housing of work-release inmates at county jails and local confinement facilities. Inmates may be placed in the care of the agencies but shall remain the responsibility of the Division and shall be subject to the complete supervision of the Division. The Division may reimburse the agencies for the support of the inmates at a rate not in excess of the average daily cost of inmate care in the corrections unit to which the inmate would otherwise be assigned.

History.

1917, c. 286, s. 15; C.S., s. 7732; 1925, c. 163; 1933, c. 172, s. 18; 1955, c. 238, s. 9; 1967, c. 996, s. 5; 1975, c. 679, ss. 1, 2; 1977, c. 297; 1983, c. 376; 1985, c. 589, s. 55; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i); 2017-186, s. 2(lllllll); 2019-76, s. 29; 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (p).

§ 148-22.1.
Educational facilities and programs for selected inmates. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety is authorized to take advantage of aid available from any source in establishing facilities and developing programs to provide inmates of the State prison system with such academic and vocational and technical education as seems most likely to facilitate the rehabilitation of these inmates and their return to free society with attitudes, knowledge, and skills that will improve their prospects of becoming law-abiding and self-supporting citizens. The State Department of Public Instruction is authorized to cooperate with the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety in planning academic and vocational and technical education of prison system inmates, but the State Department of Public Instruction is not authorized to expend any funds in this connection.

In expending funds that may be made available for facilities and programs to provide inmates of the State prison system with academic and vocational and technical education, the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety shall give priority to meeting the needs of inmates who are less than 21 years of age when received in the prison system with a sentence or sentences under which they will be held for not less than six months nor more than five years before becoming eligible to be considered for a parole or unconditional release. These inmates shall be given appropriate tests to determine their educational needs and aptitudes. When the necessary arrangements can be made, they shall receive such instruction as may be deemed practical and advisable for them.

The Secretary of Public Safety, in consultation with the Office of Human Resources, shall set the salary supplement paid to teachers, instructional support personnel, and school-based administrators who are Division of Prison employees and are licensed by the State Board of Education. The salary supplement shall be at least five percent (5%), but not more than the percentage supplement they would receive if they were employed in the local school administrative unit where the job site is located. These salary supplements shall not be paid to central office staff. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to include “merit pay” under the term “salary supplement”.

History.

1959, c. 431; 1967, c. 996, s. 13; 1985, c. 226, s. 1; 1993, c. 180, s. 8; 2005-276, s. 29.19(c); 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i); 2012-83, s. 61; 2013-382, s. 9.1(c); 2017-186, s. 2(mmmmmmm).

§ 148-22.1.
Educational facilities and programs for selected inmates. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction is authorized to take advantage of aid available from any source in establishing facilities and developing programs to provide inmates of the State prison system with such academic and vocational and technical education as seems most likely to facilitate the rehabilitation of these inmates and their return to free society with attitudes, knowledge, and skills that will improve their prospects of becoming law-abiding and self-supporting citizens. The State Department of Public Instruction is authorized to cooperate with the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction in planning academic and vocational and technical education of prison system inmates, but the State Department of Public Instruction is not authorized to expend any funds in this connection.

In expending funds that may be made available for facilities and programs to provide inmates of the State prison system with academic and vocational and technical education, the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction shall give priority to meeting the needs of inmates who are less than 21 years of age when received in the prison system with a sentence or sentences under which they will be held for not less than six months nor more than five years before becoming eligible to be considered for a parole or unconditional release. These inmates shall be given appropriate tests to determine their educational needs and aptitudes. When the necessary arrangements can be made, they shall receive such instruction as may be deemed practical and advisable for them.

The Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction, in consultation with the Office of Human Resources, shall set the salary supplement paid to teachers, instructional support personnel, and school-based administrators who are Division of Prison employees and are licensed by the State Board of Education. The salary supplement shall be at least five percent (5%), but not more than the percentage supplement they would receive if they were employed in the local school administrative unit where the job site is located. These salary supplements shall not be paid to central office staff. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to include “merit pay” under the term “salary supplement”.

History.

1959, c. 431; 1967, c. 996, s. 13; 1985, c. 226, s. 1; 1993, c. 180, s. 8; 2005-276, s. 29.19(c); 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i); 2012-83, s. 61; 2013-382, s. 9.1(c); 2017-186, s. 2(mmmmmmm); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (p).

§ 148-22.2.
Procedure when surgical operations on inmates are necessary.

The medical staff of any penal institution of the State of North Carolina is hereby authorized to perform or cause to be performed by competent and skillful surgeons surgical operations upon any inmate when such operation is necessary for the improvement of the physical condition of the inmate. The decision to perform an operation shall be made by the chief medical officer of the institution, with the approval of the superintendent of the institution, and with the advice of the medical staff of
the institution. No operation shall be performed without the consent of the inmate; or, if the inmate is a minor, without the consent of a responsible member of the inmate’s family, a guardian, or one having legal custody of the minor; or, if the inmate be non compos mentis, then the consent of a responsible member of the inmate’s family or of a guardian shall be obtained. Any surgical operations on inmates of State penal institutions shall also be subject to the provisions of Article 1A of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes,

G.S. 90-21.13

, and

G.S. 90-21.16

.

If the operation on the inmate is determined by the chief medical officer to be an emergency situation in which immediate action is necessary to preserve the life or health of the inmate, and the inmate, if sui juris, is unconscious or otherwise incapacitated so as to be incapable of giving consent or in the case of a minor or inmate non compos mentis, the consent of a responsible member of the inmate’s family, guardian, or one having legal custody of the inmate cannot be obtained within the time necessitated by the nature of the emergency situation, then the decision to proceed with the operation shall be made by the chief medical officer and the superintendent of the institution with the advice of the medical staff of the institution.

In all cases falling under this section, the chief medical officer of the institution and the medical staff of the institution shall keep a careful and complete record of the measures taken to obtain the permission for the operation and a complete medical record signed by the medical superintendent or director, the surgeon performing the operation and all surgical consultants of the operation performed.

History.

1919, c. 281, ss. 1, 2; C.S., ss. 7221, 7222; 1947, c. 537, s. 24; 1951, c. 775; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1981, c. 307, ss. 2, 3; 2003-13, s. 8; 2004-203, s. 53(a).

Cross References.

As to procedure for sterilization of mentally ill or intellectually disabled in case of medical necessity, see

G.S. 35A-1245

.

§ 148-23.
Prison employees not to use intoxicants, narcotic drugs or profanity. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

No one addicted to the use of alcoholic beverages, or narcotic drugs, shall be employed as superintendent, warden, guard, or in any other position connected with the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety, where such position requires the incumbent to have any charge or direction of the prisoners; and anyone holding such position, or anyone who may be employed in any other capacity in the State prison system, who shall come under the influence of alcoholic beverages during hours of employment, or reports for duty under the effect of intoxicants, or narcotic drugs, or who shall become intoxicated, or uses narcotic drugs, under circumstances that bring discredit on the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety, shall be subject to immediate dismissal from employment by any of the institutions and shall not be eligible for reinstatement to such position or be employed in any other position in any of the institutions. Any superintendent, warden, correctional officer, supervisor, or other person holding any position in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety who curses a prisoner under his charge shall be subject to immediate dismissal from employment and shall not be eligible for reinstatement.

History.

1917, c. 286, s. 16; 1919, c. 80, s. 8; C.S., s. 7733; 1925, c. 163; 1933, c. 172, s. 18; 1957, c. 349, s. 10; 1967, c. 996, s. 13; 1969, c. 382; 1981, c. 412, s. 4(4); c. 747, s. 66; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2012-83, s. 61; 2016-77, s. 8(c); 2017-186, s. 2(nnnnnnn).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective until January 1, 2023. For the section as amended January 1, 2023, see the following section, also numbered

G.S. 148-23

.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2016-77, s. 8(c), effective July 1, 2016, substituted “correctional officer” for “guard” in the last sentence.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(nnnnnnn), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” throughout the section.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), substituted “Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” throughout the section. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.